Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 5
HEALTH-CARE BILLING FOR INDIGENT PATIENTS
RECEIVING SERVICES NOT REIMBURSED THROUGH
THE COLORADO INDIGENT CARE PROGRAM

25.5-3-501. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Health-care facility" means:

A hospital licensed as a general hospital pursuant to part 1 of article 3 of title 25;

A hospital established pursuant to section 23-21-503 or 25-29-103;

Any freestanding emergency department licensed pursuant to section 25-1.5-114; or

Any outpatient health-care facility that is licensed as an on-campus department or service of a hospital or that is listed as an off-campus location under a hospital's license, except:

A federally qualified health center, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(4); or

A student-learning medical and dental clinic that is established for the purpose of student learning, offering discounted patient care as part of a program of student learning, and is physically situated within a health sciences school.

"Health-care services" has the same meaning as set forth in section 10-16-102 (33).

"Licensed health-care professional" means any health-care professional who is registered, certified, or licensed pursuant to title 12 or who provides services under the supervision of a health-care professional who is registered, certified, or licensed pursuant to title 12, and who provides health-care services in a health-care facility.

"Non-CICP health-care services" means health-care services provided in a health-care facility for which reimbursement under the Colorado indigent care program, established in part 1 of this article 3, is not available.

"Qualified patient" means an individual whose household income is not more than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level and who received a health-care service at a health-care facility.

"Screen" or "screening" means a process identified in rule by the state department whereby health-care facilities assess a patient's circumstances related to eligibility criteria and determine whether the patient is likely to qualify for public health-care coverage or discounted care, inform the patient of the health-care facility's determination, and provide information to the patient about how the patient can enroll in public health-care coverage.

"Uninsured" means an uninsured individual, as defined in section 10-22-113 (5)(d).

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1198), ch. 435, p. 2874, § 1, effective September 7.

25.5-3-502. Requirement to screen patients for eligibility for public health-care programs and discounted care - rules.

Beginning September 1, 2022, a health-care facility shall screen, unless a patient declines, each uninsured patient for eligibility for:

Public health insurance programs including but not limited to medicare; the state medical assistance program, articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5; emergency medicaid; and the children's basic health plan, article 8 of this title 25.5;

Discounted care through the Colorado indigent care program, established in part 1 of this article 3, if the patient receives a service eligible for reimbursement through the program; and

Discounted care, as described in section 25.5-3-503.

Health-care facilities shall use a single uniform application developed by the state department when screening a patient pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

If a health-care facility determines that a patient is ineligible for discounted care, the facility shall provide the patient notice of the determination and an opportunity for the patient to appeal the determination in accordance with state department rules.

If the patient declines the screening described in subsection (1) of this section, the health-care facility shall document the patient's decision in accordance with state department rules. A patient's decision to decline the screening that is documented and complies with state department rules is a complete defense to a claim brought by a patient under section 25.5-3-506 (2) for a violation of section 25.5-3-506 (1)(a) or (1)(b).

If requested by the patient, a health-care facility shall screen an insured patient for discounted care pursuant to subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c) of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1198), ch. 435, p. 2875, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1403), ch. 203, p. 1362, § 1, effective May 20.

25.5-3-503. Health-care discounts on services not eligible for Colorado indigent care program reimbursement.

Beginning September 1, 2022, if a patient is screened pursuant to section 25.5-3-502 and is determined to be a qualified patient, a health-care facility and a licensed health-care professional shall, for emergency and other non-CICP health-care services:

Limit the amounts charged to not more than the discounted rate established in state department rule pursuant to section 25.5-3-505 (2)(j);

Collect amounts charged, not including amounts owed by third-party payers, in monthly installments such that the patient is not paying more than four percent of the patient's monthly household income on a bill from a health-care facility and not paying more than two percent of the patient's monthly household income on a bill from each licensed health-care professional; and

After a cumulative thirty-six months of payments, consider the patient's bill paid in full and permanently cease any and all collection activities on any balance that remains unpaid.

A health-care facility shall not:

Deny discounted care on the basis that the patient has not applied for any public benefits program; or

Adopt or maintain any policies that result in the denial of admission or treatment of a patient because the patient lacks health insurance coverage, may qualify for discounted care, requires extended or long-term treatment, or has an unpaid medical bill.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1198), ch. 435, p. 2876 § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1403), ch. 203, p. 1362, § 2, effective May 20.

25.5-3-504. Notification of patients' rights.

Beginning September 1, 2022, a health-care facility shall make information developed by the state department about patients' rights under this part 5 and the uniform application developed by the state department pursuant to section 25.5-3-505 (2)(i) available to the public and to each patient. At a minimum, the health-care facility shall:

Post the information in all required languages pursuant to this subsection (1) conspicuously on the health-care facility's website, including a link to the information on the health-care facility's main landing page;

Make the information available in patient waiting areas;

Make the information available to each patient, or the patient's legal guardian, verbally, which may include using a professional interpretation service, or in writing in the patient's or legal guardian's primary language before the patient is discharged from the health-care facility; and

Inform each patient on the patient's billing statement of the patient's rights pursuant to this part 5, including the right to apply for discounted care, and provide the website, e-mail address, and telephone number where the information may be obtained in the patient's primary language.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1198), ch. 435, p. 2877, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1403), ch. 203, p. 1362, § 3, effective May 20.

25.5-3-505. Health-care facility reporting requirements - agency enforcement - report - rules.

Beginning September 1, 2023, and each September 1 thereafter, each health-care facility shall report to the state department data that the state department determines is necessary to evaluate compliance across race, ethnicity, age, and primary-language-spoken patient groups with the screening, discounted care, payment plan, and collections practices required pursuant to this part 5. If a health-care facility is not capable of disaggregating the data required pursuant to this subsection (1) by race, ethnicity, age, and primary language spoken, the health-care facility shall report to the state department the steps the facility is taking to improve race, ethnicity, age, and primary-language-spoken data collection and the date by which the facility will be able to disaggregate the reported data.

No later than April 1, 2022, the state board shall promulgate rules necessary for the administration and implementation of this part 5. At a minimum, the rules must:

Outline a process for an insured patient to request a screening pursuant to section 25.5-3-502 (5);

Outline a process for documenting, pursuant to section 25.5-3-502 (4), that a patient has made an informed decision to decline the screening, including procedures for retaining such documentation;

Establish the process for and the maximum number of days that a health-care facility has to:

Initiate a screening after a patient receives services;

Request information from the patient needed for the screening process; and

Complete the screening process;

Outline the requirements for notifying the patient of the results of the screening, including an explanation of the basis for a denial of discounted care and the process for appealing a denial;

Establish guidelines for patient appeals regarding eligibility for discounted care pursuant to section 25.5-3-503;

Establish a methodology that all health-care facilities must use to determine monthly household income. The methodology must not consider a patient's assets.

Identify the documents that may be required to establish income eligibility for discounted care using the minimum amount of information needed to determine eligibility;

Identify the steps a health-care facility and licensed health-care professional must take before sending patient debt to collections;

Create a single uniform application that a health-care facility shall use when screening a patient for eligibility for the Colorado indigent care program and discounted care, as described in section 25.5-3-502; and

Annually establish rates for discounted care pursuant to section 25.5-3-503 (1)(a). The rates should approximate and not be less than one hundred percent of the medicare rate or one hundred percent of the medicaid base rate, whichever is greater. The state department shall publicly post the established rates on the state department's website.

In promulgating rules pursuant to this section, the state department shall:

Align the processes of qualifying for and appealing denials of eligibility for the Colorado indigent care program with discounted care, as described in section 25.5-3-502; and

Consider potential limitations relating to the federal "Emergency Medical Treatment and Labor Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395dd.

Prior to promulgating rules pursuant to this section, the state department shall hold at least one stakeholder meeting with hospital representatives, health-care consumers, and health-care consumer advocates that is accessible to individuals whose primary language is not English, if requested.

No later than April 1, 2022, the state department shall:

Using feedback from hospital health-care consumers and health-care consumer advocate stakeholders, develop a written explanation of a patient's rights under this section that is written in plain language at a sixth-grade reading level and translated into all languages spoken by ten percent or more of the population in each county of the state and post the written explanation in all required languages on the state department's website. Each health-care facility shall make the explanation available to the public and each patient as provided in section 25.5-3-504.

Establish a process for patients to submit a complaint relating to noncompliance with this part 5 to the state department by phone, mail, or online. The state department shall conduct a review within thirty days after receiving a complaint.

The state department shall periodically review health-care facilities and licensed health-care professionals to ensure compliance with this section. If the state department finds that a health-care facility or licensed health-care professional is not in compliance with this section, the state department shall notify the health-care facility or licensed health-care professional and the facility or professional has ninety days to file a corrective action plan with the state department that must include measures to inform the patient about the noncompliance and provide a financial correction consistent with this part 5. A health-care facility or licensed health-care professional may request up to one hundred twenty days to submit a corrective action plan. The state department may require a health-care facility or licensed health-care professional that is not in compliance with this part 5 or any state board rules adopted pursuant to this part 5 to develop and operate under a corrective action plan until the state department determines the health-care facility or licensed health-care professional is in compliance.

If a health-care facility's or licensed health-care professional's noncompliance with this section is determined by the state department to be knowing or willful or there is a repeated pattern of noncompliance, the state department may fine the facility or professional no more than five thousand dollars. If the health-care facility or licensed health-care professional fails to take corrective action or fails to file a corrective action plan with the state department pursuant to subsection (5)(b)(II) of this section, the state department may fine the facility or professional no more than five thousand dollars a week until the facility or professional takes corrective action. The state department shall consider the size of the health-care facility and the seriousness of the violation in setting the fine amount.

The state department shall make the information reported pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and any corrective action plans for which fines were imposed pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section available to the public and shall annually report the information as a part of its presentation to its committees of reference at a hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act".

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1198), ch. 435, p. 2877, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1403), ch. 203, p. 1363, § 4, effective May 20.

25.5-3-506. Limitations on collection actions - private enforcement.

Beginning September 1, 2022, before assigning or selling patient debt to a collection agency, as defined in section 5-16-103 (3)(a), or a debt buyer, as defined in section 5-16-103 (8.5), or before pursuing, either directly or indirectly, any permissible extraordinary collection action, as defined in section 6-20-201 (7):

A health-care facility shall meet the screening requirements in section 25.5-3-502;

A health-care facility and licensed health-care professional shall provide discounted care to a patient pursuant to section 25.5-3-503;

A health-care facility and licensed health-care professional shall provide a plain language explanation of the health-care services and fees being billed and notify the patient of potential collection actions; and

A health-care facility and health-care professional shall bill any third-party payer that is responsible for providing health-care coverage to the patient. If a health-care professional is an out-of-network provider under a qualified patient's health insurance plan, the health-care professional and health insurance carrier shall comply with the out-of-network billing requirements described in sections 10-16-704 (3) and 12-30-113.

A health-care facility or licensed health-care professional that fails to comply with the requirements of this section is liable to the patient in an amount equal to the sum of:

Any actual damages sustained by the patient as a result of such failure;

In the case of such action brought by an individual, any additional damages that the court may allow, not to exceed one thousand dollars;

In the case of a class action, such amount for each named plaintiff that may recover damages under subsection (2)(b) of this section, and such amount that the court may allow for all other class members without regard to a minimum individual recovery, not to exceed the lesser of five hundred thousand dollars or one percent of the net worth of the health-care facility or licensed health-care professional; and

In the case of any successful action to enforce the foregoing liability, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court. On a finding by the court that the action was brought in bad faith, the court may award reasonable attorney fees to the defendant that are related to the work expended and costs.

In determining the amount of liability in any action pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the court shall consider, among other relevant factors:

In any individual action brought pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the frequency and persistence of noncompliance by the health-care facility or licensed health-care professional, the nature of such noncompliance, and the extent to which such noncompliance was intentional; or

In any individual action brought pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section, the frequency and persistence of noncompliance by the health-care facility or licensed health-care professional, the nature of such noncompliance, the resources of the health-care facility or licensed health-care professional, the number of individuals adversely affected, and the extent to which the health-care facility's or licensed health-care professional's noncompliance was intentional.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (HB 21-1198), ch. 435, p. 2880, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1403), ch. 203, p. 1363, § 5, effective May 20.